Idaho, session 2026, S1444.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support
Program's Division of Student Support the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
I. OPERATIONS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income Fund $4,141,200


II. CHILDREN'S PROGRAMS DIVISION:
FROM:
Federal Grant Fund 7,800,000
TOTAL $11,941,200
SECTION 2. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student
Support, the following amounts shall be considered expended from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FROM:
Public School Endowment Income Fund $4,141,200
Federal Grant Fund 7,800,000
TOTAL $11,941,200
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's
Division of Student Support is hereby reduced by the following amounts from
the designated programs from the Public School Income Fund for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FROM:
Administrators Division $1,767,300
Operations Division 7,141,200
Children's Programs Division 843,100
TOTAL $9,751,600
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the transfer made from the General Fund to the Public School Income Fund in
Section 32 of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, is hereby reduced by $9,751,600 for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. Of the amounts reduced in Section 3 of this act from the
Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student Support,
$9,751,600 shall be reduced from the amounts considered expended from the
General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. VIRTUAL SCHOOL BUDGET REDUCTION. Notwithstanding Section 10
of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second Regular Session of the
Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027, the distribution factor for discretionary funds for fully virtual
schools shall be $19,723 per support unit.
SECTION 7. TRANSPORTATION FUNDING. Notwithstanding Section 33-1006,
Idaho Code, and any other law to the contrary, for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027, the total moneys paid to school districts and charter
schools for eligible transportation costs shall be reduced by $7,500,000.


The State Department of Education shall adjust the distribution proportion-
ately across all eligible schools.
SECTION 8. VIRTUAL ENROLLMENT AND ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS. School dis-
tricts and public charter schools not authorized as a public virtual school
that provide instruction to students through an online platform for any
class, excluding those offered through the Idaho Digital Learning Academy,
shall report to the State Department of Education and the Office of the State
Board of Education which classes are online-based and the number of stu-
dents enrolled in and attendance of students for each online class. School
districts and public charter schools that offer classes through an online
option must register those programs as virtual buildings in the Idaho System
for Education Excellence longitudinal data system and record the students in
those buildings accordingly.
SECTION 9. ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNER DISTRIBUTIONS. For the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, only, of the moneys appropriated in Section
5 of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second Regular Session of the
Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, and set to be distributed pursuant to Sec-
tion 26 of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second Regular Session of
the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, $2,250,000 shall instead be transferred
one time from the Central Services Division to the Children's Programs Di-
vision by the State Department of Education and distributed pursuant to the
requirements in Section 17 of Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted by the Second
Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature.
SECTION 10. That Section 27 as added by Senate Bill No. 1362, if enacted
by the Second Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and
the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECTION 27. CONTENT AND CURRICULUM -- TECHNOLOGY. Of the mon-
eys appropriated in Section 5 of this act, an amount not to exceed
$1,570,000 from the Public School Income Fund may be expended by the
State Department of Education to contract for services that pro-
vide technology education opportunities and/or information tech-
nology certifications to students, including faculty that prepare
students for college, career, or the workplace. Funding shall be
awarded for projects that include three two or more of the following
components:
(1) Certification of skills and competencies;
(2) Professional development for teachers;
(3) Integration with curriculum standards;
(4) Online access to research-based content and curriculum; or
(5) Instructional software for classroom use.
The State Department of Education shall provide a report to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee, the Senate Education Com-
mittee, and the House Education Committee by January 5, 2027, re-
garding the number and type of certificates earned by students and
faculty.


SECTION 11. SPECIAL EDUCATION DATA. The State Department of Education
shall compile and report aggregate information regarding special educa-
tion expenditures and Medicaid reimbursements for local education agencies
(LEAs)in Idaho. The report shall include, to the extent practicable un-
der federal guidelines and using existing data sources, the total special
education expenditures and revenues reported by LEAs, including state, lo-
cal, and federal funds, and the total Medicaid reimbursements received by
LEAs for special education services. To the extent practicable using ex-
isting data sources, the State Department of Education shall consult with
the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division on ad-
ditional information to include in the report to best support legislative
decision-making. The department shall submit the report to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Legislative Services Office Budget
and Policy Analysis Division no later than December 15, 2026.
SECTION 12. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 13. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 2, Chap-
ter 43, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Di-
vision of Student Support $7,800,000 from the Federal Grant Fund to be ex-
pended for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 14. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 13 of
this act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of
Student Support, $7,800,000 shall be considered expended from the Federal
Grant Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 15. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 13 and 14 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 12 of this
act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.